Arkansas, session 2025, HB1477.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-17-2503(b)-(d), concerning the
application process for the Arkansas Teacher of the Year Act, are amended to
read as follows:
(b) The process shall allow that each Arkansas school district board
of directors may and each governing body of an open-enrollment public charter
school to submit a single applicant for the Arkansas Teacher of the Year.
(c) The applicants An applicant shall be reduced to sixteen (16)
finalists representing one (1) applicant for each of the fifteen (15)
education service areas and one (1) applicant for school districts in Pulaski
County submitted to the division by a school district board of directors or
governing body of an open-enrollment public charter school under subsection
(b) of this section no later than April 1 of the year in which the Arkansas
Teacher of the Year is selected.
*TNL188*
02/13/2025 8:24:57 AM TNL188

HB1477
(d) In By submitting an application for Arkansas Teacher of the Year,
a school district or governing body of an open-enrollment public charter
school agrees that if its applicant is selected, the school district or open-
enrollment public charter school shall place that teacher on paid
administrative leave for the school year immediately following his or her
selection, as provided in § 6-17-2504.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-17-2503(f), concerning reimbursement to a
school district that has a teacher placed on paid administrative leave under
the Arkansas Teacher of the Year Act, is amended to read as follows:
(f) During the school year in which a school district's or an open-
enrollment public charter school's Arkansas Teacher of the Year is on paid
administrative leave, the division shall reimburse the school district or
open-enrollment public charter school as provided in § 6-17-2505.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-17-2504 is amended to read as follows:
6-17-2504. School district and open-enrollment public charter school
responsibility.
(a) Each school district and open-enrollment public charter school
whose applicant is selected as Arkansas Teacher of the Year shall place that
teacher on paid administrative leave for the school year immediately
following the teacher's selection as Arkansas Teacher of the Year for the
time period that the teacher actually serves as the Arkansas Teacher of the
Year.
(b) The teacher shall be entitled to return to his or her former
employment with the school district or open-enrollment public charter school
for the school year following the paid administrative leave provisions of
this section.
(c) The school district or open-enrollment public charter school shall
be responsible for providing a replacement teacher or restructuring class
loads during the school year in which the teacher selected as Arkansas
Teacher of the Year is on administrative leave.
(d) A school district or open-enrollment public charter school that
employs a substitute teacher to replace the Arkansas Teacher of the Year
shall not be subject to any earning limitations set in place by law or the
Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.
02/13/2025 8:24:57 AM TNL188

HB1477
(e) Each school district or open-enrollment public charter school
classroom teacher contract shall reflect the administrative leave provisions
of this section for any teacher selected as Arkansas Teacher of the Year.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-17-2505(a), concerning reimbursement to a
public school district that has a teacher who is on paid administrative leave
under the Arkansas Teacher of the Year Act, is amended to read as follows:
(a) During the school year in which a school district's or an open-
enrollment public charter school's Arkansas Teacher of the Year is on paid
administrative leave, the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education
shall reimburse the school district or open-enrollment public charter school
for:
(1) The teacher's salary and benefits; and
(2)(A) Incidental expenses incurred by the teacher as a result
of his or her participation in the Arkansas Teacher of the Year Program.
(B) All incidental expenses shall be approved by the
division.



















02/13/2025 8:24:57 AM TNL188